District of Columbia statutes.
4-113

Members and employees to have no interest in contracts.

No member or employee of said Board shall be either directly or indirectly interested in any contract for building, repairing, or furnishing any institution which by this chapter the Board of Public Welfare is authorized to investigate and supervise.

June 6, 1900, 31 Stat. 665, ch. 807
Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 210, ch. 58, § 10
Charitable institutions, conflicts of interest, see § 44-714.
1981 Ed., § 3-113.
1973 Ed., § 3-113.
Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.